Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.230

Rights of employees and bargaining representatives of school districts dissolved due to financial insolvency.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, employees and bargaining representatives of school districts that are dissolved due to financial insolvency shall have resort to collective bargaining, including grievance arbitration and other processes, only to the extent provided by RCW 28A.315.229.

[ 2012 c 186 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Rule-making authority—2012 c 186: See RCW 28A.315.902.